District of Columbia statutes.
22-3202

Aggregation of amounts received to determine grade of offense.

Amounts or property received pursuant to a single scheme or systematic course of conduct in violation of § 22-3211 (Theft), § 22-3221 (Fraud), § 22-3223 (Credit Card Fraud), § 22-3227.02 (Identity Theft), § 22-3231 (Trafficking in Stolen Property), or § 22-3232 (Receiving Stolen Property) may be aggregated in determining the grade of the offense and the sentence for the offense.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 102, 29 DCR 3976
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-24, § 6, 30 DCR 3341
Apr. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-120, § 101(a), 58 DCR 11235

History

1981 Ed., § 22-3802.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 19-120 rewrote the section, which formerly read:
“Amounts received pursuant to a single scheme or systematic course of conduct in violation of § 22-3211 (Theft), § 22-3221 (Fraud), or § 22-3223 (Credit Card Fraud) may be aggregated in determining the grade of the offense and the sentence for the offense, except that with respect to credit card fraud only amounts received within a consecutive 7-day period may be aggregated.”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 101(a) of Receiving Stolen Property and Public Safety Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-261, December 21, 2011, 58 DCR 11232).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 101(a) of Receiving Stolen Property and Public Safety Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-326, March 19, 2012, 59 DCR 2384).

Emergency Legislation